dev/numerals/numerals.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j/>ও<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="একশ__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="an"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="এক__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="an"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="an"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="an"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>জন</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="hu"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="চৌদ্দ"><i>চৌদ্দ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বায়ান্ন"><i>বায়ান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতাশ"><i>সাতাশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতশ"><i>সাতশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঁচাত্তর"><i>পঁচাত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চুয়ান্ন"><i>চুয়ান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঁচিশ"><i>পঁচিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতান্ন"><i>সাতান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঁয়ত্রিশ"><i>পঁয়ত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাব্বিশ"><i>ছাব্বিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছয়শত"><i>ছয়শত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটানব্বই"><i>আটানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চুয়াত্তর"><i>চুয়াত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="দশ"><i>দশ</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একাত্তর"><i>একাত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="এগার"><i>এগার</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="নয়শত"><i>নয়শত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পাঁচশ"><i>পাঁচশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পাঁচ"><i>পাঁচ</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চব্বিশ"><i>চব্বিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তিরানব্বই"><i>তিরানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছিয়ানব্বই"><i>ছিয়ানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊনআশি"><i>ঊনআশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটষট্টি"><i>আটষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঁয়ষট্টি"><i>পঁয়ষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তিয়াত্তর"><i>তিয়াত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাত"><i>সাত</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একাশি"><i>একাশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তেইশ"><i>তেইশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আট"><i>আট</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="হাজার"><i>হাজার</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊনত্রিশ"><i>ঊনত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একষট্টি"><i>একষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সত্তর"><i>সত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বাহাত্তর"><i>বাহাত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একান্ন"><i>একান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতানব্বই"><i>সাতানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ষাট"><i>ষাট</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছেষট্টি"><i>ছেষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বাহান্ন"><i>বাহান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চুরাশি"><i>চুরাশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছিয়াশি"><i>ছিয়াশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটাত্তর"><i>আটাত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটাশি"><i>আটাশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="লক্ষ"><i>লক্ষ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরানব্বই"><i>বিরানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊনষাট"><i>ঊনষাট</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আশি"><i>আশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চারশ"><i>চারশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চোষট্টি"><i>চোষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="দুইশ"><i>দুইশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পাঁচশত"><i>পাঁচশত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একুশ"><i>একুশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতষট্টি"><i>সাতষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটচল্লিশ"><i>আটচল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটশত"><i>আটশত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চুয়াল্লিশ"><i>চুয়াল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একশ"><i>একশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একচল্লিশ"><i>একচল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তিপ্পান্ন"><i>তিপ্পান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটশ"><i>আটশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সতের"><i>সতের</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তিনশত"><i>তিনশত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একানব্বই"><i>একানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="দুইশত"><i>দুইশত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছয়"><i>ছয়</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="এক"><i>এক</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আঠাশ"><i>আঠাশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আঠার"><i>আঠার</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তেত্রিশ"><i>তেত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বার"><i>বার</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বিয়াল্লিশ"><i>বিয়াল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চল্লিশ"><i>চল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতাশি"><i>সাতাশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঞ্চাশ"><i>পঞ্চাশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটান্ন"><i>আটান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="আটত্রিশ"><i>আটত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরাশি"><i>বিরাশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতচল্লিশ"><i>সাতচল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তেতাল্লিশ"><i>তেতাল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊনসত্তর"><i>ঊনসত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চুরানব্বই"><i>চুরানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চার"><i>চার</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঁয়তাল্লিশ"><i>পঁয়তাল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊনচল্লিশ"><i>ঊনচল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাপ্পান্ন"><i>ছাপ্পান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="নিরানব্বই"><i>নিরানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="কোটি"><i>কোটি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="নব্বই"><i>নব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঁচানব্বই"><i>পঁচানব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতাত্তর"><i>সাতাত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="উনিশ"><i>উনিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাঁইত্রিশ"><i>সাঁইত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বাইশ"><i>বাইশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একত্রিশ"><i>একত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="দু"><i>দু</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বাষট্টি"><i>বাষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঞ্চান্ন"><i>পঞ্চান্ন</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পনের"><i>পনের</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="সাতশত"><i>সাতশত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="নয়"><i>নয়</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="নয়শ"><i>নয়শ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ষোল"><i>ষোল</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তেষট্টি"><i>তেষট্টি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বত্রিশ"><i>বত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊননব্বই"><i>ঊননব্বই</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তিন"><i>তিন</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছত্রিশ"><i>ছত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চৌত্রিশ"><i>চৌত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ঊনপঞ্চাশ"><i>ঊনপঞ্চাশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছেচল্লিশ"><i>ছেচল্লিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তিনশ"><i>তিনশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="লাখ"><i>লাখ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছিয়াত্তর"><i>ছিয়াত্তর</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="চারশত"><i>চারশত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="পঁচাশি"><i>পঁচাশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="একশত"><i>একশত</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="দুই"><i>দুই</i><par n="এক__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ছয়শ"><i>ছয়শ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ত্রিশ"><i>ত্রিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশ"><i>বিশ</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তিরাশি"><i>তিরাশি</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="তের"><i>তের</i><par n="একশ__num"/></e>

  </section>
</dictionary>
